Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-216.01
Microenterprise, defined.

Microenterprise shall mean any business, whether new or existing, with less than ten employees, less than twenty-five thousand dollars of net assets, and less than one hundred thousand dollars of annual sales.

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 5.